Utah statutes.
59-22-301.   Construction of this part.

This part sets forth definitions in the Master Settlement Agreement that are cross-referenced in Part 2, Model Tobacco Settlement Statute.  This part is intended for convenience only and may not be construed as substantively or otherwise altering Part 2, Model Tobacco Settlement Statute, or the Master Settlement Agreement.  Where Part 2 instructs that a term be given the same definition as that term is given in the Master Settlement Agreement, the definition shall be that set forth in the Master Settlement Agreement, as it may be amended from time to time.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 229, 2000 General Session

